src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON I_3_1_96
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_97
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2эд_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_98
	Clit;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_100
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_2эд_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_101
	Clit;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_102
	Clit;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_103
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_104
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_3_105
	Clit;
	S0_0_2өд_201_v3_3_p;
LEXICON I_3_3_106
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_2өд_201_v3_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_3_107
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5өөс_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_108
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_109
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_110
	Clit;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_111
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_112
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_113
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2од_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_114
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_115
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_116
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2од_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_117
	Clit;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_3_118
	Clit;
	S0_0_2өд_201_v3_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_3_119
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_5өөс_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_120
	Clit;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_121
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_122
	Clit;
	S0_0_2од_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_123
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_124
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_2од_201_v2_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_125
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_126
	Clit;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_127
	Clit;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_128
	Clit;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_129
	Clit;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_130
	Clit;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_131
	Clit;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_132
	Clit;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_19_1_133
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_134
	Clit;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_135
	Clit;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_136
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_137
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_1_138
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ад_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_139
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_140
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ын_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_7той_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_10оо_204_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_2_141
	Clit;
	S0_0_4ыг_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_5оос_201_v2_1_p;
	S0_0_6оор_201_v2_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_3_142
	Clit;
	S0_0_2өд_201_v3_3_p;
	S0_0_5өөс_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_6өөр_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v3_1_p;
	S0_0_10өө_204_v3_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_143
	Clit;
	S0_0_2эд_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_9=рүү_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_144
	Clit;
	S0_0_2эд_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_145
	Clit;
	S0_0_2эд_201_v4_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_10ээ_204_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_3_4_146
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_5ээс_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_6ээр_201_v4_1_p;
	S0_0_7тэй_201_v4_1_p;
LEXICON I_4_1_147
	Clit;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_2ид_201_v1_3_p;
	S0_0_4ийг_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_5аас_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_6аар_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_7тай_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_9=руу_201_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_p
	+Gen-ийн:%>ийн Clit;
	+Gen-ийн:%>ийн S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_2ид_201_v1_3_p
	+Dat-д:%>ид Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>ид S0_0_2ид_201_v1_3;
LEXICON S0_0_4ийг_201_v1_1_p
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг Clit;
	+Acc-ийг:%>ийг S0_0_4ийг_201_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_10аа_203_v1_1_iх_p
	+Refl-аа:%>хаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
	+Kh-х:%>х S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_p
	+Poss-хан:%>хан Clit;
	+Poss-хан:%>хан S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_2д_202_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_p
	+Dat-д:%>ад Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>ад S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p
	+Abl-аас:%>аас Clit;
	+Abl-аас:%>аас S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p
	+Ins-аар:%>аар Clit;
	+Ins-аар:%>аар S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p
	+Com-тай:%>тай Clit;
	+Com-тай:%>тай S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_iа_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_11х_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iг_p
	+Refl-аа:%>гаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_3аа_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_10аа_204_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_p
	+Gen-ы:%>ы Clit;
	+Gen-ы:%>ы S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_p
	+Dat-д:%>д Clit;
	+Dat-д:%>д S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_3аа_205_v1_1_p
	+Dat-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_p
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг Clit;
	+Acc-ыг:%>ыг S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1_p
	+Abl-аас:%>аас Clit;
	+Abl-аас:%>аас S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_5аас_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1_p
	+Ins-аар:%>аар Clit;
	+Ins-аар:%>аар S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_6аар_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1_p
	+Com-тай:%>тай Clit;
	+Com-тай:%>тай S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_7тай_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1_p
	+Dir-=руу:%>=руу Clit;
	+Dir-=руу:%>=руу S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_9=руу_205_v1_1;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iх_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_11х_206_v1_1_p;
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_12хан_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_iх_p
	+Refl-аа:%>хаа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_11х_206_v1_1_p
	+Kh-х:%>х Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_1ы_205_v1_1_205_12хан_206_v1_1_p
	+Poss-хан:%>хан Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_2д_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1
	S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p;
LEXICON S0_0_1ийн_201_v1_1_201_12хан_203_v1_1_203_4ыг_205_v1_1_205_10аа_206_v1_1_p
	+Refl-аа:%>аа Clit;
